District of Columbia statutes.
24-405

Arrest for violation of parole.

If said Board of Parole, or any member thereof, shall have reliable information that a prisoner has violated his parole, said Board, or any member thereof, at any time within the term or terms of the prisoner’s sentence, may issue a warrant to any officer hereinafter authorized to execute the same for the retaking of such prisoner. Any officer of the District of Columbia penal institutions, any officer or designated civilian employee of the Metropolitan Police Department of the District of Columbia, or any federal officer authorized to serve criminal process within the United States to whom such warrant shall be delivered is authorized and required to execute such warrant by taking such prisoner and returning or removing him to the penal institution of the District of Columbia from which he was paroled or to such penal or correctional institution as may be designated by the Attorney General of the United States.

July 15, 1932, 47 Stat. 698, ch. 492, § 5
June 6, 1940, 54 Stat. 242, ch. 254, § 4
July 17, 1947, 61 Stat. 378, ch. 263, § 2
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-284, § 9, 46 DCR 1328
Representation of indigents, see §§ 2-1602 and 11-2601.
Rewards for apprehension of parole violators, see § 24-201.27.
1981 Ed., § 24-205.
1973 Ed., § 24-205.
Section 9 of D.C. Law 12-282 inserted “or designated civilian employee.”
Section 13(b) of D.C. Law 12-282 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 9 of the Metropolitan Police Department Civilianization and Street Solicitation for Prostitution Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-428, August 6, 1998, 45 DCR 5884), § 9 of the Metropolitan Police Department Civilianization Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-506, November 10, 1998, 45 DCR 8139), and § 9 of the Metropolitan Police Department Civilianization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-13, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2333).